Georgia, session 2025_26, SB137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to incorporate the City of Mulberry, approved February 13, 2024 (Ga. L. 2024,
p. 3518), is amended by revising subsection (a) of Section 4.13 as follows:
"(a) The municipal court shall have jurisdiction and authority to try and punish violations
of this charter, all city ordinances, and such other violations as provided by law."
SECTION 2.
Said Act is further amended in Section 8.11 by revising subsections (e) and (g) as follows:
"(e) During such transition period, Gwinnett County shall continue to provide within the
territorial limits of the city all government services and functions which Gwinnett County
provided in that area during the years 2023 and 2024 and at the same actual cost, except
S. B. 137
- 1 -

LC 47 3325
to the extent otherwise provided in this section and except that the governing authority of
Gwinnett County shall make no modifications to the zoning of any property located within
the city during such transition period; provided, however, that upon at least 60 days' prior
written notice to Gwinnett County by the City of Mulberry, responsibility for any such
service or function shall be transferred to the City of Mulberry. During the transition
period, the city shall remain within the Gwinnett County special services district, but shall
be removed from such district at the conclusion of such period."
"(g) Any transfer of jurisdiction regarding violations of law or ordinance to the Municipal
Court of the City of Mulberry during or at the end of the transition period shall not in and
of itself abate any judicial proceeding pending in Gwinnett County or the pending
prosecution of any violation of any ordinance of Gwinnett County."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 137
- 2 -